Rhode Island, session 2025, SB557.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14-1-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 14-1 entitled "Proceedings in
Family Court" is hereby amended to read as follows:
14-1-5. Exclusive jurisdiction.
(a) The court shall, as set forth in this chapter, have exclusive original jurisdiction in
proceedings:
(1) Concerning any child residing or being within the state who is: (i) Delinquent; (ii)
Wayward; (iii) Dependent; (iv) Neglected; or (v) Mentally disabled;
(2) Concerning adoption of children;
(3) To determine the paternity of any child alleged to have been born out of wedlock and
to provide for the support and disposition of that child in case that child or the child’s mother has
residence within the state; and
(4) [Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 39, § 3 and P.L. 2021, ch. 40, § 3.]
(5) Referred to the court in accordance with the provisions of § 14-1-28.
(b) The jurisdiction of the court is concurrent with that of a federal court sitting in the state
over proceedings involving a violation of federal law committed by a child on a military installation
of the United States Department of Defense if:
(1) The United States Attorney, or the federal court waives exclusive jurisdiction; and
(2) The violation of federal law is also a crime under state law.

(c) When concurrent jurisdiction has been established pursuant to this section, the court
has exclusive original jurisdiction over any case involving a child who is alleged to be delinquent
as the result of an act committed within the boundaries of a military installation that is a crime or
infraction under state law.
(d) In any case involving a child who has previously committed such an act on a military
installation, the family court shall have exclusive and automatic jurisdiction.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001724
========
LC001724 - Page 2 of 3